Maryland, session 2026, SB0106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
[Subtitle 2. Motor Vehicle Emissions Inspection.]
[23–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Emissions control program” means the program requiring and implementing
the exhaust emissions test and the emissions equipment and misfueling inspection.
(c) “Emissions equipment” means any emissions control device that has been
installed on a motor vehicle by a manufacturer of motor vehicles.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0106*

SENATE BILL 106
(d) “Emissions equipment and misfueling inspection” means an inspection to
verify the presence of required emissions equipment and an inspection to determine that
the vehicle has not been misfueled.
(e) (1) “Emissions related repair” means the inspection, adjustment, repair, or
replacement of motor vehicle engine systems, subsystems, or components as necessary to
bring a motor vehicle into compliance with emissions standards adopted in accordance with
the provisions of this subtitle.
(2) “Emissions related repair” does not include adjustment, repair, or
replacement necessitated by tampering or misfueling.
(f) (1) “Emissions standard” means a requirement that limits the quantity,
quality, rate, or concentration of emissions from a motor vehicle.
(2) “Emissions standard” includes a requirement that relates to the
operation or maintenance of a motor vehicle to assure continuous emissions reduction.
(g) “Exhaust emissions test” means the sampling and measurement of certain
components of motor vehicle exhaust to determine whether the motor vehicle is in
compliance with an emissions standard.
(h) “Misfueling” means the introduction of leaded fuel into a motor vehicle
designed by the motor vehicle manufacturer to use unleaded fuel.
(i) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Environment.]
[23–202.
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Administration and the
Secretary shall establish an emissions control program in the State in accordance with the
federal Clean Air Act.
(2) The program shall remain in effect only as long as required by federal
law.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the emissions control
program shall provide for a biennial exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment and
misfueling inspection for all vehicles of the 1977 model year and each model year thereafter.
(2) The emissions control program may not authorize an exhaust emissions
test or emissions equipment and misfueling inspection for any vehicle of a model year
earlier than the 1977 model year.
(3) (i) In this paragraph, “qualified hybrid vehicle” means an
automobile that:

SENATE BILL 106 3
1. Meets all applicable regulatory requirements;
2. Meets the current vehicle exhaust standard set under the
federal Tier 2 program for gasoline–powered passenger cars under 40 C.F.R. Part 80 et seq.;
and
3. Can draw propulsion energy from both of the following
sources of stored energy:
A. Gasoline or diesel fuel; and
B. A rechargeable energy storage system.
(ii) A qualified hybrid vehicle is not required to submit to a first
exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment and misfueling inspection until 3 years
after the date on which the vehicle was first registered in the State.
(c) By rules and regulations, the Administration and the Secretary:
(1) Shall grant a waiver to a vehicle owner if:
(i) The vehicle fails to pass the exhaust emissions test;
(ii) The vehicle owner exhibits evidence acceptable to the
Administration that the owner, for an initial exhaust emissions test occurring:
1. In calendar years 1998 through 1999 has actually incurred
an expenditure of $150 towards emissions related repairs to the vehicle within 60 days after
the initial exhaust emissions test;
2. In calendar years 2000 through 2001 has actually incurred
an expenditure towards emissions related repairs to the vehicle within 120 days after the
initial exhaust emissions test in an amount of:
A. $200 for vehicles of model years 1990 and older;
B. $300 for vehicles of model years 1991 through 1997; or
C. $450 for vehicles of model years 1998 and newer; and
3. On or after January 1, 2002, has actually incurred an
expenditure of $450 towards emissions related repairs to the vehicle within 120 days after
the exhaust emissions test;
(iii) The vehicle fails a retest, except that if the vehicle owner has
exhibited evidence acceptable to the Administration that the vehicle owner actually

SENATE BILL 106
incurred the minimum expenditure as required under item (ii) of this item for the emissions
related repair to the vehicle within 30 days before the initial exhaust emissions test or the
period allowed under federal law, whichever is longer, a retest is not required; and
(iv) The vehicle owner exhibits evidence that the emissions related
repairs qualifying for a waiver under items (ii) and (iii) of this item were performed by a
repair technician and at a repair facility both certified under item (4) of this subsection;
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, may not grant a waiver
if it is found in the testing process that factory–installed emissions equipment has been
tampered with or removed, or that the vehicle has been misfueled;
(3) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, may grant additional
waivers to extend the time for compliance in cases of financial hardship or for unusual
circumstances;
(4) Shall establish criteria to certify repair technicians and facilities for the
purpose of bringing vehicles into compliance with the applicable emissions standards,
including the payment of reasonable fees to cover the costs of administering and overseeing
the certification program;
(5) May provide for the suspension, revocation, or denial of renewal of the
certification of a repair technician or facility upon evidence that vehicles repaired by that
technician or facility for the purpose of bringing them into compliance with the applicable
emissions standards have repeatedly failed tests or retests and the Administration and the
Secretary have clear and convincing evidence the repair technician or facility is not meeting
satisfactory performance standards;
(6) Shall define the inspection parameters for the emissions equipment and
misfueling inspection;
(7) Shall adopt a schedule for the exhaust emissions test;
(8) Shall adopt a schedule for the emissions equipment and misfueling
inspections; and
(9) Shall establish, under Title 2 of the Environment Article, emissions
standards to be used for the exhaust emissions tests and emissions equipment and
misfueling inspections of motor vehicles under this subtitle.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (c)(6) of this section or any other provision
of law, during the period from January 1, 1995 through May 31, 1997, the emissions control
program established under this subtitle may not require for any vehicle other than a
State–owned vehicle or, to the extent authorized by federal law, a federally owned vehicle:
(i) Transient mass–emission testing using the IM 240 driving cycle
referenced under 40 C.F.R. Part 51;

SENATE BILL 106 5
(ii) An evaporative system integrity (pressure) test or an evaporative
system transient purge test that requires the disconnection or manipulation of any engine
component, including any hose or emissions equipment, that is located in the vehicle’s
engine compartment;
(iii) Removal of the driver from a vehicle being tested or inspected; or
(iv) On–road testing.
(2) (i) The Administration, in consultation with the Secretary, shall
develop and offer to owners of vehicles subject to the emissions control program an incentive
program designed to encourage voluntary submission to the test described in paragraph
(1)(i) of this subsection.
(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 23–205(a)(2) of this subtitle
and subsection (c)(1) of this section, the incentives offered under this paragraph may
include reduced test fees, flexible test schedules, the waiver of late fees, the reduction of
expenditures incurred for emissions related repairs necessary to obtain a waiver, and any
other cost–effective incentive that is consistent with State and federal law and is
reasonably expected by the Administration to increase the number of vehicles that undergo
the test described in paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) 1. The Administration shall notify vehicle owners of the
opportunity to voluntarily submit a vehicle to the testing described in subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph.
2. The notice required under this subparagraph shall be:
A. Prominently displayed at all emissions inspection
facilities; and
B. Included by the Administration in test notices and other
mailings related to the emissions control program that are directed to vehicle owners.]
[23–203.
(a) (1) By rules and regulations, the Administration and the Secretary shall
provide for the establishment of facilities to conduct any tests or inspections required to be
performed under this subtitle.
(2) If the Administration and the Secretary determine that the system can
be installed and operated more effectively and economically by an independent contractor
than if installed and operated by the Administration and the Secretary, the Administration
and the Secretary may award the installation and operation of the inspection facilities to
an independent contractor selected in accordance with the bidding procedures established
by the laws of this State.

SENATE BILL 106
(3) (i) If, on or after July 1, 1991, the Administration and Secretary are
required by federal law to extend the emissions control program to additional areas of the
State and the Administration and Secretary determine that the inspection facilities can be
installed and operated more effectively and economically by one or more independent
contractors than if installed and operated by the Administration and Secretary, the
Administration and Secretary may:
1. Award the installation and operation of the inspection
facilities to one independent contractor for the installation and operation of all inspection
facilities in this State; or
2. Create separate regions of the areas of the State required
to participate in an emissions control program for the purpose of separately awarding
contracts for the installation and operation of the inspection facilities required for each
region to one or more independent contractors.
(ii) All independent contractors shall be selected in accordance with
the procedures established under the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(iii) The Administration and the Secretary may establish a statewide
centralized or decentralized program or any combination of centralized and decentralized
programs in separate regions of the State.
(b) If the program is awarded to an independent contractor to operate centralized
inspection facilities, the facilities shall be provided, equipped, and maintained by the
independent contractor, and the operating personnel of the facilities shall be employees of
the contractor, and not of the State, and the contractor may not perform emissions related
repairs as defined in § 23–201 of this subtitle.
(c) The Administration and the Secretary shall determine, on or before March 1,
1998, whether the following criteria for establishing a decentralized retesting program
have been satisfied:
(1) Testing equipment and procedures, yielding results that correlate to
tests and inspections performed at centralized inspection facilities in the State within 95%
accuracy or within a different degree of accuracy approved by the Administration and the
Secretary, are feasible for use in certified repair facilities approved for retesting of vehicles;
and
(2) The establishment of a decentralized retesting option in the State does
not result in a loss of emissions reduction benefits to the State under the federal Clean Air
Act.
(d) If the Administration and the Secretary determine that the criteria listed in
subsection (c) of this section have not been met in a given year, they shall determine, on or

SENATE BILL 106 7
before March 1 of the succeeding year, whether the criteria have been satisfied in the
intervening period.
(e) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, if the program is
awarded to an independent contractor to operate centralized inspection facilities and if the
Administration and the Secretary have determined that the criteria listed in subsection (c)
of this section have been satisfied, the Administration and the Secretary shall propose
regulations to:
(1) Allow the owner of a vehicle that fails an exhaust emissions test or
emissions equipment and misfueling inspection at a centralized inspection facility to have
the vehicle retested at either a centralized inspection facility or an approved certified repair
facility;
(2) Allow a certified repair facility to retest vehicles if approved for that
purpose by the Department of the Environment;
(3) Require the initial exhaust emissions test and emissions equipment
and misfueling inspection in each biennial test cycle to be performed at a centralized
inspection facility;
(4) Establish criteria for testing equipment, procedures, and reporting of
retests for approved certified repair facilities;
(5) Provide for the suspension, revocation, or denial of renewal of approval
for a certified repair facility to perform retests if the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee,
determines that the facility has performed fraudulent retests or is not in compliance with
the regulations adopted under this subsection; and
(6) Establish a reasonable fee for approval of a certified repair facility to
perform retests, covering the costs of the approvals and oversight of the decentralized
retesting program.]
[23–204.
The facilities established or approved under § 23–203 of this subtitle shall conduct
the exhaust emissions tests and emissions equipment and misfueling inspections of motor
vehicles to determine whether each vehicle complies with emissions standards established
under this subtitle for that vehicle.]
[23–205.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Administration and the
Secretary shall set the fee to be charged for each vehicle to be inspected and tested by a
facility.
(2) The fee established under this subsection:

SENATE BILL 106
(i) During the period from May 31, 1997, through June 30, 2025,
may not exceed $14;
(ii) During the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, may
not exceed $30; and
(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (4)(iii) of this subsection, during
the period after July 1, 2026, shall equal at least the amount in the immediately preceding
fiscal year adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(3) During the period after June 30, 2026, the fee established under this
subsection shall equal at least the amount in the immediately preceding fiscal year
adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(4) (i) The inflation adjustment shall equal the product of multiplying
the amount of funding in the immediately preceding fiscal year by the percentage increase
in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers.
(ii) The percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers shall be determined by comparing the average of the index for the 12
months ending April 30 immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the funding
amount is being calculated to the average index for the prior 12 months.
(iii) If there is a decline or no growth in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, the fee amount under this paragraph shall remain unchanged.
(b) The fee shall be collected in a manner established by the Administration and
the Secretary.
(c) A specific portion of the fee shall be paid to or retained by the Administration
to cover the cost of administration and enforcement of the emissions control program, as
provided in the contract between the contractor and the State.]
[23–206.
(a) An owner of a motor vehicle that is registered in this State shall have the
vehicle inspected and tested as required under this subtitle.
(b) A motor vehicle registered in this State, unless exempted or given a waiver
under this subtitle, shall meet the standards and requirements of this subtitle.
(c) Notwithstanding any rule or regulation to the contrary, the owner of any
gasoline powered motor vehicle registered under § 13–916 of this article, with a maximum
gross weight up to and including 26,000 pounds, shall have the vehicle inspected and tested
as required under this subtitle.]

SENATE BILL 106 9
[23–206.1.
Notwithstanding any rule or regulation to the contrary and unless otherwise
prohibited by federal law, any fire or rescue apparatus or ambulance owned or leased by a
political subdivision of the State, or by a volunteer fire company, rescue squad, or volunteer
ambulance company, that is registered as an emergency vehicle as defined in § 11–118 of
this article, is exempt from mandatory inspections under this subtitle.]
[23–206.2.
(a) (1) A motor vehicle for which special registration plates have been issued
under § 13–616 of this article is exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this
subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle meet the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) The motor vehicle is driven 5,000 miles or less annually; and
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That the owner of the motor vehicle meets the disability
requirements of § 13–616(b)(1) of this article;
(ii) That the motor vehicle has been issued a special disabled
person’s registration number and special registration plates under § 13–616 of this article;
(iii) That the motor vehicle is driven 5,000 miles or less annually; and
(iv) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(b) (1) A motor vehicle owned by an individual who is at least 70 years of age
at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is exempt from the
mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) All of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years of age
at the time of the scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) The motor vehicle is being driven 5,000 miles or less annually;
and

SENATE BILL 106
(iii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify the following:
(i) That all of the owners of the motor vehicle are at least 70 years
of age at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle;
(ii) That the motor vehicle is being driven 5,000 miles or less
annually; and
(iii) The motor vehicle’s odometer reading at the time of the
certification.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(c) (1) A motor vehicle owned by at least one active duty member of the
uniformed services at the time of a scheduled mandatory inspection under this subtitle is
exempt from the mandatory inspections required by this subtitle if:
(i) An owner of the motor vehicle who is a member of the uniformed
services has received official orders:
1. For deployment outside the United States; or
2. To a duty station in a jurisdiction that is not subject to a
vehicle emissions control inspection and maintenance program; and
(ii) The exemption is not otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(2) In order to qualify for an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, all owners of the motor vehicle shall certify that at least one owner of the motor
vehicle has received official orders for deployment outside the United States or to a duty
station in a jurisdiction that is not subject to a vehicle emissions control inspection and
maintenance program.
(3) The certification required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
made on a form provided by the Administration.
(d) The Administrator may adopt regulations as necessary to administer or
enforce the provisions of this section.]
[23–206.4.
(a) In this section, “zero–emission vehicle” means any vehicle that:

SENATE BILL 106 11
(1) Is determined by the Secretary to be of a type that does not produce any
tailpipe or evaporative emissions; and
(2) Has not been altered from the manufacturer’s original specifications.
(b) A zero–emission vehicle is exempt from the mandatory tests and inspections
required by this subtitle.
(c) The Administration and the Secretary shall adopt regulations necessary to:
(1) Provide for the determination of which vehicles are zero–emission
vehicles; and
(2) Implement the provisions of this section.]
[23–207.
The Administration and the Secretary may jointly adopt rules and regulations as
required for purposes of implementation, administration, regulation, and enforcement of
the provisions of this subtitle, including rules and regulations that, consistent with federal
law, exempt certain vehicles from the inspections and tests under this subtitle.]
[23–209.
A person may not commit any fraud or make any misrepresentation in applying for
or preparing documentation relating to this subtitle.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.